Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of  Revenue, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Administration..........................  $ 67,377,269
(2) Property Tax Division ............... $ 15,226,068
(3) Personal Tax and Compliance
Division..................................... $ 72,322,560
(4) Business Division ...................... $ 21,537,927
(5) Nonprofit Housing for
the Elderly ................................ $ 3,226,364
(6) Debt Service.............................. $ 21,296,288
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in this section, collected or received by the Department  of Revenue, for the
following purposes:
(1) Administration.......................... $ 13,059,928
(2) Property Tax Division ............... $ 42,989,093
(3) Personal Tax and Compliance
Division..................................... $ 1,649,689
(4) Business Division ...................... $ 17,138,195
(5) Marijuana Division.................... $ 4,306,884
(6) Multistate Tax Commission ...... $ 295,488
(7) Senior Property Tax Deferral ... $ 32,602,286
(8) Debt Service.............................. $ 1,185,157
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2017.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5535 (SB 5535-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate July 4, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5535 (SB 5535-A) Page 2